Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 6. Revocable Trusts.

§ 91-8-601.
Capacity of settlor of revocable trust.

The capacity required to create, amend, revoke, or add property to a revocable trust, or to direct the actions of the trustee of a revocable trust, is the same as that required to make a will. To be effective as a post-death disposition of property transferred during the transferor’s life or by the transferor’s will to a trust of which the transferor is the settlor or deemed to be the settlor, neither a revocable nor an irrevocable trust existing on or executed after July 1, 2014, has to be executed with the formalities of a will.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-602.
Revocation or amendment of revocable trust.

Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is irrevocable, the settlor may revoke or amend the trust. This subsection (a) does not apply to a trust created under an instrument executed before July 1, 2014.

If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one (1) settlor:

To the extent the trust consists of community property, the trust may be revoked by either spouse acting alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses;

To the extent the trust consists of property other than community property, each settlor may revoke or amend the trust with regard to the portion of the trust property attributable to that settlor’s contribution;

At the death of one (1) settlor, each surviving settlor shall have the right to revoke the trust as to the surviving settlor’s portion of the trust as determined by the type of property in accordance with subsection (b) (1) or (2); and

Upon the revocation or amendment of the trust by fewer than all of the settlors or upon the death of one (1) of the settlors, the trustee shall promptly notify the other settlors of the revocation, amendment or death.

A later will or codicil that expressly refers to the trust or specifically devises property that would otherwise have passed according to the terms of the trust; or

Any other method manifesting clear and convincing evidence of the settlor’s intent; however, a written revocable trust may only be amended and revoked by a later written instrument delivered to the trustee.

Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee shall deliver the trust property as the settlor directs. However, with respect to community property under subsection (b) (1), the trustee shall deliver the property one-half (1/2) to each spouse unless the trust instrument specifically states otherwise.

A settlor’s powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property may be exercised by an agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the terms of the trust or the power.

A conservator or guardian of the settlor may exercise a settlor’s powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property only with the approval of the court supervising the conservatorship or guardianship.

A trustee who does not know that a trust has been revoked or amended is not liable to the settlor or settlor’s successors in interest for distributions made and other actions taken on the assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.

The settlor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:

By substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms of the trust; or

If the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by:

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-603.
Settlor’s powers; powers of withdrawal.

While a trust is revocable rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor.

If a revocable trust has more than one (1) settlor, the duties of the trustee are owed to all of the settlors having capacity to revoke the trust.

During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal has the rights of a settlor of a revocable trust under this section to the extent of the property subject to the power.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-604.
Limitation on action contesting validity of revocable trust; distribution of trust property.

A person may commence a judicial proceeding to contest the validity of all or part of the terms of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death within the earlier of:

Two (2) years after the settlor’s death; or

One hundred and twenty (120) days after the trustee sent the person a copy of the trust instrument and a notice informing the person of the trust’s existence, of the trustee’s name and address, and of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

Upon the death of the settlor of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death, the trustee may proceed to distribute the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust. The trustee is subject to liability for doing so only if:

The trustee knows of a pending judicial proceeding contesting the validity of all or part of the terms of the trust; or

A potential contestant has notified the trustee of a possible judicial proceeding to contest the trust and a judicial proceeding is commenced within sixty (60) days after the contestant sent the notification.

A beneficiary of a trust that is determined by a court proceeding to be invalid, in whole or in part, is liable to return to the court any distribution received for proper distribution to the extent that the invalidity applies to the distribution. If the beneficiary refuses to return the distribution after being ordered by the court, the beneficiary shall be liable for all costs incurred for recovery of the distribution.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 2014.